Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6615
Hospice program; volunteers exempt.

Sections 71-6601 to 71-6612 shall not apply to any volunteers working on behalf of a hospice licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act who, as part of their volunteer duties, provide home health care.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 130;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 64;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 66;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 137.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.